Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 22 Tabulation and Certification of Returns by State Board

17-22-1.
Commencement and continuance of tabulations.

The state board shall commence the counting, canvassing, and tabulating of all votes cast, including mail ballots, at eight o’clock (8:00) p.m. on any election day at which mail ballots may be cast and within twenty-four (24) hours after any other election or primary, and shall continue and complete the tabulation with all reasonable expedition by using an optical scan count system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 825, § 3; P.L. 1905, ch. 1229, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 19, § 3; P.L. 1914, ch. 1050, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1930, ch. 1592, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 311, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-22-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 73, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 14; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 14; P.L. 2018, ch. 55, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 58, § 2.

17-22-2.
Public sessions for counting — Persons permitted within railed space.

The sessions of the state board for the counting, canvassing, and tabulating provided for in §

17-22-1

, and for the opening of the inner certifying envelopes containing mail ballots and for the counting, canvassing, and tabulating of these ballots, shall be public, but no notice or advertisement of these sessions needs to be given. The opening, counting, canvassing, and tabulating shall be done within a railed space in the room in which it takes place, and the board shall admit within the railed space the candidate, or at least one representative of the candidate, for whom votes are at the time being opened, counted, canvassed, or tabulated who may scrutinize the opening, count, canvass, and tabulation in accordance with the rules which may be adopted by the board. The board shall also admit to the opening, counting, canvassing, and tabulating an equal number of representatives of each political party who shall be party voters of the parties represented by them. These representatives, as well as the representatives of candidates, shall be authorized in writing by the chairperson of the state committees of their respective political parties or by the candidates whom they represent, as the case may be. Insofar as applicable, the procedures provided for in this chapter shall be followed by the local boards in the counting and tabulating of municipal mail ballots, except only that in these instances the representatives of political parties shall be appointed by the chairpersons of the city or town committees of their respective political parties. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prevent the board from admitting, in its discretion, other persons and representatives of the press within the railed space during the opening, counting, canvassing, and tabulating.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 825, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 19, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 18, § 5; P.L. 1930, ch. 1592, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 311, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-22-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 73, § 4.

17-22-3.
Deputy sheriffs attending sessions — Disturbance of proceedings.

The sheriff of Providence County shall assign as many of the sheriff’s deputies as the state board may request to attend upon the board during its sessions to preserve order. The orders of the presiding officer of the board at the meetings shall be obeyed by the deputies, and they shall, at the direction of the presiding officer, remove from the room where any session is being held any person not a member of the board. Any person who disturbs or interferes with the proceedings of any session shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 825, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 19, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 18, § 7; P.L. 1930, ch. 1592, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 311, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-22-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 12.

17-22-4.
Investigation of returns of local boards.

In case the return made to the state board by any election officer or officers of any town or district meeting contains any statement or information which makes it desirable or proper, in the opinion of the board, to investigate the conduct of the election in the town or district, the board may investigate the truth of the allegations contained in the returns, and of all the circumstances connected with the holding of the election, and shall use in its count, canvass, and tabulation, as the result of the voting at the meeting, the number of votes for the respective candidates and for and against the propositions or questions voted for or on that the investigation, in the state board’s opinion, proves to be correct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 825, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 19, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 18, § 10; P.L. 1930, ch. 1592, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 31, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-22-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-22-5.
Certificates of election — Statement to secretary of state.

The state board shall immediately, after the result has been ascertained, furnish to each candidate elected a certificate of that candidate’s election, and shall deliver to the secretary of state, who shall keep it on file in the secretary’s office, a statement of:

The number of votes cast in each voting district, town, and city for each candidate;

The total number cast in the state for each of the candidates for electors and for general officers;

The total number cast in each congressional district for each candidate for representative in congress;

The total number cast in each senatorial and representative district for each candidate for senator and representative in the general assembly;

The number of votes cast in each voting district, town, and city for and against any proposed amendment of the Constitution, or question submitted to the electors of the state;

The total number of votes cast in the state for and against any proposed amendment or question;

The names of the respective candidates elected and the offices to which they have been respectively elected;

Whether or not the proposed amendment has been adopted; and

Whether or not any question has been assented to by the electors of the state.

The certificates and statement shall be signed by the board and shall be final and conclusive evidence of the matters contained in them and of the title of the persons declared elected to the offices for which they have severally received certificates of election, except as otherwise provided in the Constitution of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 825, § 4; P.L. 1905, ch. 1229, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 19, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 18, § 4; P.L. 1930, ch. 1592, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 311, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-22-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 22.

17-22-5.1.
Investigation by board of elections prior to certification.

At any time prior to the certification of the results of a particular election, the state board of elections may, upon its own motion, investigate any allegation of error, irregularity, or impropriety in the conduct of any facet of the election which comes to its attention and may, upon its own motion, take appropriate action based upon the findings of the investigation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 25.

17-22-5.2.
Certificates of local elections — Statement to secretary of state.

The local board shall immediately, after the result has been ascertained, furnish to the secretary of state a statement of the number of votes cast in the city or town for each candidate, the total number of votes cast in the city or town for and against any proposed amendment to a charter or question, and the names of the respective candidates elected and the offices to which they have been respectively elected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 410, § 1.

17-22-6.
Certification of results to governor and secretary of state — Failure to elect to general assembly.

The state board shall, immediately after completing the counting, canvass, and tabulating of the votes cast for general officers and senators and representatives in the general assembly and declaring the result, furnish the governor a certificate of the names of the persons who have been elected general officers for the ensuing year, and shall also furnish to the secretary of state a certificate of the names of the persons elected as senators and representatives in the general assembly. Whenever the count, canvass, and tabulation of the board shows that there has been a failure to elect a senator or representative or any of them in any district, the board shall immediately certify the fact to the secretary of state, specifying which of the officers were not elected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 825, § 8; P.L. 1905, ch. 1229, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 19, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 18, § 8; P.L. 1930, ch. 1592, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 311, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-22-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 22.

17-22-7.
Books of record of votes — Contents.

The board shall keep separate books of record of the votes cast for the different classes of officers which it is its duty to count, canvass, and tabulate, as follows:

A book of record of votes cast for electors of president and vice-president;

A book of record of votes cast for senators and representatives in congress;

A book of record of votes cast for general officers; and

A book of record of the votes cast for each class of officers that may by law subsequently be required to be counted, canvassed, and tabulated by the board.

Each of the respective books shall contain:

A record of the number of votes cast in each voting district for each candidate according to the counting, canvassing, and tabulating of the board;

The number cast in each voting district for each candidate according to the certificates of the moderators or wardens and clerks;

The total number cast for each candidate in each town and city according to the counting and to the certificates;

The total number cast for each candidate in the state or congressional district, as the case may be, according to the counting and the certificates;

A statement of which candidates are elected; and

Any other pertinent facts that the board deems proper.

The board shall also keep a book of record of the votes cast for and against any proposition of amendment of the Constitution and a book of record of the votes cast for and against all questions submitted to the electors of the state, with like detail as provided in this section in relation to votes cast for officers.

Notwithstanding the above, the state board shall report all write-in votes received by persons, not otherwise qualifying to appear on the ballot and receiving less than five (5) votes in a race, as a composite total of all write-in votes cast for said office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 825, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 19, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 18, § 12; P.L. 1930, ch. 1592, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 311, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-22-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 482, § 1.

17-22-8.
Lists of absentee voters.

The state board, not later than thirty (30) days after any election day at which voting by mail ballot is permitted by chapter 20 of this title, shall prepare and mail to the local board of each city and town a list of names of every voter of the city or town who has voted by mail ballot.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 25; G.L. 1956, § 17-10-40; G.L. 1956, §

17-22-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 209, § 5; 1963, ch. 73, § 4.

17-22-9.
Oath of members and assistants — Penalty for violations.

The members, secretary, and assistants of the state board shall be sworn to the faithful and impartial performance of their duties, and any member, secretary, or assistant who willfully neglects to perform the duties devolved upon him or her by this chapter at the times provided, or who makes any fraudulent count, tabulation, certificate, or statement, or in any way willfully performs his or her duties to defeat the obtaining of a correct count and tabulation of the votes cast, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 825, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 19, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 18, § 18; P.L. 1930, ch. 1592, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 311, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-22-8

; G.L. 1956, §

17-22-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 12.